Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Brake Fluid Regulation

17.310.
“Brake fluid” defined.

The term “hydraulic brake fluid” as used in KRS

17.310

to

17.340

shall mean the liquid medium through which force is transmitted to the brakes in the hydraulic brake system of a vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 116, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

17.320.
Standards for brake fluid and Transportation Cabinet’s regulations.

Every hydraulic brake fluid that shall be sold, offered for sale, or used for service in any vehicle shall conform to the standards and specifications of the Society of Automotive Engineers applicable to such fluid.

The Transportation Cabinet shall adopt and enforce regulations and standards which shall be compatible with the standards and specifications of the Society of Automotive Engineers, so far as practicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 116, §§ 2, 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(17).

17.330.
Analysis and labeling of brake fluid.

Every manufacturer of any hydraulic brake fluid sold, offered for sale, or used for service in any vehicle shall submit to the Transportation Cabinet for approval a laboratory analysis report for each product produced, sold, or used in Kentucky. The analysis shall be conducted by an independent and qualified testing laboratory and shall verify that each product meets the minimum standards of heavy duty type hydraulic brake fluid specifications, designated as S. A. E. 70-R-1.

Any alteration or adulteration made to any approved hydraulic brake fluid by the manufacturer, dealer, or seller shall be reported to the Transportation Cabinet. An approval from the Transportation Cabinet shall be obtained before any such product shall be sold, offered for sale, or used for service in this state.

Every can, bottle, or other type of container used for the containing of hydraulic brake fluid shall be labeled to specify the composition of the contents. Such specifications shall denote conformity of the contents with the minimum standards of heavy duty type hydraulic brake fluid specifications, designated as S. A. E. 70-R-1.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 116, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(17).

17.340.
Transportation Cabinet’s approval of analysis required.

The Transportation Cabinet shall approve the laboratory analysis report as to its conformity with the standards required by KRS

17.310

to

17.340

, and no hydraulic brake fluid shall be sold in this state after September 1, 1960, unless such approval has been granted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 116, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(17).